Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.100

Appeal—Reassessment.

The decision of the board upon any objections made within the time and in the manner herein prescribed may be reviewed by the superior court upon an appeal taken thereto in the manner provided for taking appeals from objections in local improvement districts of cities and towns.

The board shall have the same powers of reassessment and shall proceed to make such reassessments in the same manner and subject to the same limitations as are provided by law for the making of reassessments in local improvement districts of cities and towns.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.88.100. Prior: 1951 c 192 s 10.]